District of Columbia, session 26, B26-0471.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE COUNCIL OF THE DISTRICT OF COLUMBIA, That this
10 act may be cited as the “Special Events Permit Process Simplification Act of 2025”.
11 Sec. 2. Definitions.
12 For the purposes of this act, the term:
13 (1) “BID” means a Business Improvement District established pursuant to section
14 2 of the Business Improvement Districts Act of 1996, effective May 29, 1996 (D.C. Law 11-134;
15 D.C. Official Code § 2–1215.01).
16 (2) “Conditional approval” means preliminary authorization granted by the
17 Mayor’s Special Events Task Group permitting an organization to proceed with planning a
1

18 special event requiring street closures, contingent upon the organization’s receipt of all required
19 permits and fulfillment of all applicable agency requirements.
20 (3) “DMPED” means the Deputy Mayor for Planning and Economic
21 Development.
22 (4) “Final approval” means authorization granted by the Mayor’s Special Events
23 Task Group for an organization to hold a special event requiring street closures upon
24 confirmation that all required permits have been issued and all applicable agency requirements
25 have been satisfied.
26 (5) “MSETG” means the Mayor’s Special Events Task Group.
27 (6) “OSE” means the Office of Special Events, established by section 3.
28 (7) "Special event” means an organized activity held on public sidewalks or
29 public streets that impedes normal traffic or pedestrian flow, including but not limited to block
30 parties, farmers’ markets, parades, festivals, and filming events.
31 Sec. 3. Establishment of the Office of Special Events.
32 (a) There is established within DMPED an Office of Special Events (“OSE”).
33 (b) The OSE shall:
34 (1) Assist the public in navigating the permitting and approval process for all
35 types of special events;
36 (2) Organize and oversee the MSETG as established under section 5; and
37 (3) Administer the Special Events Fund established under section 8.
38 (c) First amendment event permits shall be applied for directly through the Metropolitan
39 Police Department and are excluded from OSE responsibilities.
40 Sec. 4. Special Event Application Portal.
2

41 (a) The OSE shall establish and maintain a publicly accessible website that includes, at a
42 minimum:
43 (1) An up-to-date calendar of street closures and an events list showing approved
44 dates and locations;
45 (2) A video explaining the special event permitting process for each type of
46 special event;
47 (3) Free training videos for event coordinators, including on event safety and
48 cardiopulmonary resuscitation; and
49 (4) An online portal for special event application submission, including:
50 (A) A questionnaire about the type and size of the event and other factors
51 determining the type of the special event and permits required;
52 (B) A check list of all required permits determined by the questionnaires
53 with direct weblinks to application forms;
54 (C) A total cost estimate and breakdown of expected permit fees and other
55 fees charged by agencies;
56 (D) An application processing timeline, including the status of the
57 application; and
58 (E) Contact information, including a phone number and email address for
59 an OSE staff member available to answer questions.
60 (b) Special event applications shall be submitted via the OSE portal shall provide an
61 alternative ‘rain date’ in the application.
62 Sec. 5. Establishment of the Mayor’s Special Events Task Group.
3

63 (a) There is established within DMPED, a Mayor’s Special Events Task Group
64 (“MSETG”), which may consist of representatives from the following agencies:
65 (1) Department of Licensing and Consumer Protection (“DLCP”);
66 (2) District Department of Transportation;
67 (3) Metropolitan Police Department;
68 (4) Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department;
69 (5) Homeland Security and Emergency Management Agency;
70 (6) Department of Health;
71 (7) Department of Buildings;
72 (8) National Park Service; and
73 (9) Any additional agencies designated by DMPED.
74 (b) The MSETG shall:
75 (1) Review plans for special events requiring street closures, excluding block
76 parties, as defined in section 2 of the Block Party Act of 2012, effective October 23, 2012 (D.C.
77 Law 19-190, D.C. Official Code § 9–631), and Tier 1 events, as described in subsection (g)(A) of
78 this section.
79 (2) Issue determinations regarding conditional and final approval; and
80 (3) Coordinate interagency review of required permits and community
81 notifications.
82 (c) Applicants shall submit all materials required for conditional approval in the Notice of
83 Interest (“NOI”) application.
84 (d) After reviewing the NOI materials, MSETG may require the applicant to present
85 virtually before the task group and shall provide a list of required agency permits.
4

86 (e) To receive final approval from MSETG, the applicant shall submit:
87 (1) Proof of issuance of all required agency permits;
88 (2) Evidence of compliance with all applicable agency requirements;
89 (3) Written notice to businesses, residents, and Advisory Neighborhood
90 Commissions (“ANCs) located on a street that is closed for the event within one month of the
91 event; and
92 (4) Confirmation of having presented before affected ANCs to address
93 community questions and concerns.
94 (f) Applicants shall not be required to collect signatures from businesses or residents.
95 (g) Events requiring street closures shall be classified into the following tiers. Applicants
96 shall apply under the highest tier for which any condition applies:
97 (A) Tier 1 for events which are:
98 (ii) No longer than one day;
99 (B) Held on no more than 1 city blocks;
100 (D) Expected to host no more than 149 attendees at any one time.
101 (2) Tier 2 for events which are:
102 (A) No longer than one day;
103 (B) Held on more than 2 city blocks;
104 (C) Expected to host between 150 and 250 attendees at any one
105 time.
106 (3) Tier 3 for events which are:
107 (A) More than one day;
108 (B) Recurring;
5

109 (C) On a street with WMATA transportation stops;
110 (D) Permitted to sell alcohol; or
111 (E) Expected to host more than 250 attendees at any one time.
112 (h)(1) Tier 1 event applicants shall submit an application through the OSE portal within
113 10 business days before the event and shall not be required to pay an application fee or DLCP
114 special events license fee.
115 (2) Agencies shall issue all required permits for Tier 1 event applicants no later
116 than 3 business days prior to the event.
117 (h)(1) Tier 2 event applicants shall submit an NOI application within 20 business days
118 before the event and shall pay no more than $200 in application fees and DLCP special event
119 license fees.
120 (2) MSETG shall issue its final decision for Tier 2 event applicants no later than
121 15 business days after the applicant submits an NOI application.
122 (i)(1) Tier 3 event applicants shall submit an application within 120 business days before
123 the event and shall pay no more than $500 in application fees and DLCP special event license
124 fees.
125 (2) MSETG shall issue its final decision for Tier 3 event applicants no later than
126 110 business days after the applicant submits an NOI application.
127 Sec. 6. Multi-Year Special Event Approval for Business Improvement Districts.
128 (a) MSETG shall permit BIDs to apply for conditional approval for a period of 5 years to
129 hold recurring special events that require street closures if:
130 (1) The BID organized the same event in the previous calendar year; and
6

131 (2) The event held during the previous calendar year did not result in documented
132 safety or health violations or incidents deemed significant by MSETG.
133 (b) Applications for multi-year special events approval shall include, at a minimum:
134 (1) The date and rain date of the event each calendar year;
135 (2) Economic and livability metrics;
136 (3) Application documents provided to MSETG during the previous year; and
137 (4) Any planned changes to the application from the previous calendar year.
138 (c) MSETG may charge the BID a one-time fee for a multi-year special events
139 conditional approval application that is equal to the fee for a one-year conditional approval
140 application.
141 (d) After receiving a five-year conditional approval agreement from MSETG, a BID shall
142 apply and receive all required permits before receiving final approval from MSETG.
143 (e) Within 30 days after an event, the BID shall submit the following information to
144 MSETG through the online portal as part of post-event reporting:
145 (1) Estimated event attendance;
146 (2) Office of Tax and Revenue compliance requirements for vendors;
147 (3) Documentation of any operational or safety issues that occurred at the event;
148 and
149 (4) Photographs documenting the removal of street signs.
150 (f)(1) If a BID makes any changes to the event plan that impact the life safety, security or
151 traffic control plan during the 5-year period of conditional approval, the BID must submit an
152 amendment for approval to MSETG at least 60 days before the event date.
7

153 (2) A BID shall provide written notice to MSETG of any de minimis changes to
154 its event plan.
155 (g) MSETG may at any time revoke a BID’s conditional approval if MSETG deems that
156 the event poses health or safety risks to the public.
157 (h) MSETG shall consider a BID’s adherence to agency standards and requirements at
158 the event each year when considering renewing the 5-year approval agreement.
159 Sec. 7. Special Events Task Force.
160 (a) The OSE shall convene a task force composed of representatives from each agency
161 that issues permits related to special events.
162 (b) The task force shall meet for the first time no later than 60 days after the applicability
163 date of this act.
164 (c) Within 6 months of the applicability date of this act, the task force shall identify and
165 submit recommendations to the Mayor and Council regarding:
166 (1) Permit requirements that are duplicative or unnecessary;
167 (2) Strategies to simplify permit applications and processes; and
168 (3) Risk reduction strategies, including technologies that could reduce the need
169 for city services at special events.
170 Sec. 8. Special Events Program.
171 (a) There is established a Special Events Program, administered by OSE, to provide
172 grants to organizations hosting special events with street closures through a competitive
173 application process.
174 (b) The Program shall provide at least 16 grants annually, distributed evenly among the
175 District’s 8 wards.
8

176 (c) Grant applications shall be available via the OSE portal and shall require the applicant
177 to demonstrate how the event will:
178 (1) Generate foot traffic for a commercial corridor; and
179 (2) Generate economic benefits for small businesses.
180 (d) Grants shall fully or partially cover permit fees and other expenses charged by the
181 following agencies:
182 (1) Alcoholic Beverage and Cannabis Administration;
183 (2) Department of Licensing and Consumer Protection;
184 (3) Department of Health;
185 (4) Department of Parks and Recreation;
186 (5) Department of Public Works;
187 (6) Department of Transportation;
188 (7) Fire and Emergency Medical Services Department;
189 (8) Metropolitan Police Department; and
190 (9) Washington Metropolitan Area Transit Authority.
191 (e) Grant recipients shall report post-event metrics via the application portal, including:
192 (1) Approximate number of attendees; and
193 (2) Local business tax revenue impacts during the event period.
194 Sec. 9. Fiscal impact statement.
195 The Council adopts the fiscal impact statement in the committee report as the fiscal
196 impact statement required by section 4a of the General Legislative Procedures Act of 1975,
197 approved October 16, 2006 (120 Stat. 2038; D.C. Official Code § 1-301.47a).
198 Sec. 10. Effective date.
9

199 This act shall take effect following approval by the Mayor (or in the event of veto by the
200 Mayor, action by the Council to override the veto) and a 30-day period of congressional review
201 as provided in section 602(c)(l) of the District of Columbia Home Rule Act, approved December
202 24, 1973 (87 Stat. 813; D.C. Official Code§ l-206.02(c)(l)).
10